New Jersey, session 222, S3401.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a casino licensee or its Internet gaming affiliate shall be prohibited from initiating or sending mobile device push notifications or text message notifications, including alerts, to an Internet gaming account holder to solicit Internet gaming account wagers or deposits on any Internet gaming platform operated by the casino licensee or its Internet gaming affiliate. b.  For the purposes of this section, push notification means an automatic electronic message displayed on an Internet gaming account holders device, when the user interface for the mobile casino licensee or its Internet gaming affiliates platform is not actively open or visible on the device, that prompts the Internet gaming account holder to check or engage with such platform. c.  Any casino licensee or its Internet gaming affiliate that violates the prohibition set forth in this section shall be fined not less than $500 per offense. d.  The division shall promulgate, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. 2.  a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a sports wagering licensee or contracted operator thereof shall be prohibited from initiating or sending mobile device push notifications or text message notifications, including alerts, to a patron to solicit sports wagers or deposits on any sport wagering platform operated by the sports wagering licensee or contracted operator thereof. b.  For the purposes of this section, push notification means an automatic electronic message displayed on a patrons device, when the user interface for the mobile sports wagering licensee or contracted operators platform is not actively open or visible on the device, that prompts the patron to check or engage with such platform. c.  Any sports wagering licensee or contracted operator thereof that violates the prohibition set forth in this section shall be fined not less than $500 per offense. d.  The division, in consultation with the commission, shall promulgate, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.